Missouri, session 2026, HB2583.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 226, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 226.1215, to read as follows:
226.1215. 1. The department of transportation shall conduct a study on
increasing the speed limit to seventy-five miles per hour on roadways within the
interstate system and report the findings of that study no later than August 28, 2028, to
the governor, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the president pro tempore
of the senate.
2. Any concerns or objections raised in the report relating to increasing the
speed limit shall be accompanied by a discussion of potential ways to mitigate such
concerns or objections.
3. For purposes of this section, "interstate system" means that portion of the
national system of interstate and defense highways located within the boundaries of
Missouri, as officially designated or as may be hereafter designated by the state
highways and transportation commission with the approval of the Secretary of
Commerce, pursuant to Title 23, United States Code, as amended.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.